Colorado statutes. TITLE 31 Government - Municipal
PART 4
CHANGE OF NAME

31-2-401. Petition to change name.

Proceedings to change the name of any city or town in this state may be initiated by filing with the governing body thereof a written petition therefor, which petition shall be signed by registered electors thereof equal in number to fifty percent of the total votes cast for all candidates for mayor in the last regular election of the city or town, requesting that the name of the city or town be changed.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1020, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 87:

Entire section amended, p. 326, § 77, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-1-301 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-2-402. Name filed with secretary of state.

After the presentation of the petition mentioned in section 31-2-401, the name proposed to be given to such city or town shall be filed by the clerk in the office of the secretary of state, to be retained there for a period of at least thirty days, and, upon application, the secretary of state, at any time after the expiration of said thirty days from said filing, shall grant a certificate stating that such name has not been given to any other municipality in this state if such is the fact. If such name has been adopted by any other municipality, as appears from the records in his office, the secretary of state shall so notify the clerk filing such name in his office, in which event no further proceedings shall be undertaken unless another petition, setting forth a different proposed name, is filed, which such different proposed name shall likewise be filed with the secretary of state. No further proceedings for a change of name shall be commenced until a certificate is received from the secretary of state attesting that the proposed name has not been adopted elsewhere in this state.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1020, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-1-302 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-2-403. Secretary to keep alphabetical list.

The secretary of state shall ascertain the names of all the municipalities within this state and shall arrange such names in alphabetical order for convenient reference. Such list of names shall be kept filed in his office and shall be changed when a change of name is effected under the provisions of this part 4.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1020, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-1-303 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-2-404. Notice of hearing on petition.

At any meeting of the governing body of any city or town after the presentation of the petition, the governing body shall fix the time when the petition shall be considered and order notice of the presentation thereof to be given by publishing such notice once each week for three successive weeks in some newspaper having a general circulation in such city or town. If there is no such newspaper, publication shall be by posting a copy of said notice in three public places within the municipal limits. Such notice shall state that a change of the name of such city or town has been petitioned for and the time when action on said petition will be had, at which time remonstrances, if any, will be heard.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1020, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-1-304 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-2-405. Hearing postponed.

If for any reason at the time fixed in the notice provided for in section 31-2-404 action thereon is not taken, such petition for a change of name shall be heard, with all remonstrances, at any subsequent meeting of the governing body of any such city or town. If said governing body is satisfied that such change of name is necessary and proper, they shall thereupon make an order changing the name of such city or town and adopting the name petitioned for in the petition.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1021, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-1-305 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-2-406. Secretary to give notice.

If said change of name is made or if any new city or town is incorporated, the governing body of any such city or town shall cause a copy of the order making such change or fixing the name of such new city or town to be filed in the office of the secretary of state, who shall thereupon make known such facts by publication in some newspaper of general circulation in the county in which such city or town is situated.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1021, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-1-306 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-2-407. Change does not affect liability.

Nothing in this part 4 shall affect the rights, privileges, or liabilities of such city or town, or those of any person, as the same existed before such change of name. All proceedings pending in any court or place in favor of or against said city or town may be continued to final consummation under the name in which the same were commenced.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1021, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-1-307 as it existed prior to 1975.